Utah statutes.
59-7-302.   Definitions.
As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1)  "Aircraft type" means a particular model of aircraft as designated by the
manufacturer of the aircraft.
(2)  "Airline" is as defined in Section 59-2-102.
(3)  "Airline revenue ton miles" means, for an airline, the total revenue ton
miles during the airline's tax period.
(4)  "Business income" means income arising from transactions and activity in
the regular course of the taxpayer's trade or business and includes income
from tangible and intangible property if the acquisition, management, and
disposition of the property constitutes integral parts of the taxpayer's
regular trade or business operations.
(5)  "Commercial domicile" means the principal place from which the trade or
business of the taxpayer is directed or managed.
(6)  "Compensation" means wages, salaries, commissions, and any other form of
remuneration paid to employees for personal services.
(7) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (7)(b), "mobile flight equipment" is
as defined in Section 59-2-102.
(b)  "Mobile flight equipment" does not include:
(i)  a spare engine; or
(ii)  tangible personal property described in Subsection 59-2-102(25) owned by
an:
(A)  air charter service; or
(B)  air contract service.
(8)  "Nonbusiness income" means all income other than business income.
(9)  "Revenue ton miles" is determined in accordance with 14 C.F.R. Part 241.
(10)  "Sales" means all gross receipts of the taxpayer not allocated under
Sections 59-7-306 through 59-7-310.
(11)  "State" means any state of the United States, the District of Columbia,
the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, any territory or possession of the United
States, and any foreign country or political subdivision thereof.
(12)  "Transportation revenue" means revenue an airline earns from:
(a)  transporting a passenger or cargo; or
(b)  from miscellaneous sales of merchandise as part of providing
transportation services.
(13)  "Utah revenue ton miles" means, for an airline, the total revenue ton
miles within the borders of this state:
(a)  during the airline's tax period; and
(b)  from flight stages that originate or terminate in this state.
